Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.195

Exemptions.

(1) This chapter shall not apply to military or federal government employees.

(2) This chapter does not prohibit or regulate:

(a) Fitting or dispensing by students enrolled in a board-approved program who are directly supervised by a licensed hearing aid specialist, a licensed audiologist under the provisions of this chapter, or an instructor at a two-year hearing aid specialist degree program that is approved by the board;

(b) Hearing aid specialists, speech-language pathologists, or audiologists of other states, territories, or countries, or the District of Columbia while appearing as clinicians of bona fide educational seminars sponsored by speech-language pathology, audiology, hearing aid specialist, medical, or other healing art professional associations so long as such activities do not go beyond the scope of practice defined by this chapter; and

(c) The practice of audiology or speech-language pathology by persons certified by the Washington professional educator standards board as educational staff associates, except for those persons electing to be licensed under this chapter. However, a person certified by the board as an educational staff associate who practices outside the school setting must be a licensed audiologist or licensed speech-language pathologist.

[ 2014 c 189 s 15; 2006 c 263 s 802; 2005 c 45 s 4; 2002 c 310 s 21; 1998 c 142 s 15; 1996 c 200 s 27; 1983 c 39 s 22.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.